apertium-sl-es.sl.dix
	<pardef n="ni/zati__vblex">
   		<e>       <p><l>zati</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>zat</l>      <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>

	    <e>       <p><l>zam</l>      <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>žem</l>      <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>zaš</l>      <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>žeš</l>      <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>za</l>       <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>že</l>       <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>zava</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>ževa</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>	      <p><l>zata</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>žeta</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>zata</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>žeta</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>zamo</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>žemo</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e> 	  <p><l>zate</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>žete</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>zajo</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e r="LR"><p><l>žejo</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e>       <p><l>zal</l>      <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bil"/></e>

		<e>       <p><l>žaj</l>      <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__imperative"/></e>

		<e>       <p><l>zanj</l>     <r>zati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__žvižganje"/></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="navz/eti__vblex">
   		<e>       <p><l>eti</l>    <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>et</l>     <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>

	    <e>       <p><l>amem</l>   <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>ameš</l>   <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>ame</l>    <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>ameva</l>  <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>	      <p><l>amesta</l> <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>amesta</l> <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>amemo</l>  <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e> 	  <p><l>ameste</l> <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>amejo</l>  <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    
	    <e>       <p><l>el</l>     <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bil"/></e>

		<e>       <p><l>emi</l>    <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__imperative"/></e>
		
		<!-- gerund form? -->
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="verj/eti__vblex">
   		<e>       <p><l>eti</l>    <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>et</l>     <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>

	    <e>       <p><l>amem</l>   <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>ameš</l>   <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>ame</l>    <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>ameva</l>  <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>	      <p><l>amesta</l> <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>amesta</l> <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>amemo</l>  <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e> 	  <p><l>ameste</l> <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e>       <p><l>amejo</l>  <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    
	    <e>       <p><l>el</l>     <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bil"/></e>

		<e>       <p><l>emi</l>    <r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__imperative"/></e>
		
		<!-- gerund form? -->
    </pardef>

	<e lm="nizati">          <i>ni</i><par n="ni/zati__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="navzeti">         <i>navz</i><par n="navz/eti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="verjeti">         <i>verj</i><par n="navz/eti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="verjeti">         <i>verj</i><par n="verj/eti__vblex"/></e>
